Washington statutes.
RCW 18.290.040

Licensing requirements.

The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the applicant meets the following requirements:

(1) Graduation from a master's or doctorate program in genetic counseling or medical genetics approved by the secretary;

(2) Successful completion of any clinical experience requirements established by the secretary; and

(3) Successful completion of an examination administered or approved by the secretary.

[ 2009 c 302 s 4.]